test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_uaivat_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - uáivát+v1: # From literal sources
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Nom: uáiˊvát
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Gen: uáiˊvát
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Acc: uáiˊvát
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Ill: uáiˊvátân 
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Loc: uáiˊvátist 
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Com: uáiˊvátáin
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Abe: uáiˊváttáá
    uáivát+v1+N+Ess:    uáiˊváttin
    uáivát+v1+N+Par:    uáiˊváttid
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Nom: uáiˊváteh
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Gen: uáiˊvátij
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Acc: uáiˊvátijd
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Ill: uáiˊvátáid 
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Loc: uáiˊvátijn
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Com: uáiˊvátijguin
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Abe: uáiˊvátijttáá

  Noun - uáivát+v2: # According to Ella Sarre 
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Nom: uáivát
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Gen: uáiˊváát
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Acc: uáiˊváát
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Ill: uáiˊváátân
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Loc: uáiˊvááttist
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Com: uáiˊvááttáin
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Abe: uáiˊvááttáá
    uáivát+v2+N+Ess: uáiˊvááttin
    uáivát+v2+N+Par: uáiˊvááttid
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Nom: uáiˊváátteh
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Gen: uáiˊvááttij
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Acc: uáiˊvááttijd
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Ill: uáiˊvááttáid
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Loc: uáiˊvááttijn
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Com: uáiˊvááttijguin
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Abe: uáiˊvááttijttáá

  Noun - uáivát+v3: # According to Elsa Väisänen 
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Nom: uáivát
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Gen: uáiˊvát
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Acc: uáiˊvát
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Ill: uáiˊváttân
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Loc: uáiˊváttist
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Com: uáiˊváttáin
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Abe: uáiˊváttáá
    uáivát+v3+N+Ess: uáiˊváttin
    uáivát+v3+N+Par: uáiˊváttid
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Nom: uáiˊvátteh
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Gen: uáiˊváttij
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Acc: uáiˊváttijd
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Ill: uáiˊváttáid
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Loc: uáiˊváttijn
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Com: uáiˊváttijguin
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Abe: uáiˊváttijttáá


 # A rare word, inflection problematic.
 # Reverse dictionary: uáiˊvát: lok. uáiˊvááttist
 # How many yamls / lexicons? 
